Missouri, session 2026, HB2963.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.025, to read as follows:
9.025. The month of January is hereby designated as "Blood Donor Awareness
2 Month". It is recommended to the people of this state that the month be appropriately
3 observed through activities that increase awareness of the importance of blood
4 donation. The state deems blood and blood products to be a critical resource and a vital
5 public health asset that must be readily available at all times.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.